Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 3
MEDICAL SERVICES BOARD

25.5-1-301. Medical services board - creation.

There is created in the state department the medical services board, referred to in this part 3 as the "board". The board consists of members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate as follows:

One member from each congressional district in the state; and

Three members from the state at large.

The governor shall appoint persons to the board who have knowledge of medical assistance programs, and one or more of the appointments may include a person or persons who have received services through programs administered by the department within two years of the date of appointment.

No more than a minimum majority of the members of the board may be affiliated with the same political party.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall include:

One member from the private sector who has experience with the delivery of health care;

One member who has experience or expertise in caring for medically underserved children; and

Representation by at least one member who is a person with a disability, as defined in section 24-34-301 (2.5), a family member of a person with a disability, or a member of an advocacy group for persons with disabilities, provided that the other requirements of this subsection (1) are met.

Each member serves at the pleasure of the governor for a term of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than a minimum majority of members' terms expire in the same year.

Members shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary actual expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as members of the board.

Vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the remainder of any unexpired term.

The board is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1557, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 916, § 12, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1797, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1281), ch. 399, p. 2154, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-183), ch. 132, p. 465, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1364), ch. 351, p. 2082, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 62, § 85, effective February 25; (5) added, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3371, § 59, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-1-302. Medical services board - organization.

The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice-president, and such other board officers as it shall determine. All board officers shall hold their offices at the pleasure of the board.

Regular meetings of the board shall be held not less than once every three months at such times as may be fixed by resolution of the board. All meetings of the board, in every suit and proceeding, shall be considered to have been duly called and regularly held and all orders and proceedings of the board to have been authorized, unless the contrary is proven.

The board shall adopt, and at any time may amend, bylaws in relation to its meetings and the transaction of its business. A majority shall constitute a quorum of the board. The vote of a majority of a quorum of the board shall constitute the action of the board. The board shall act only by resolution adopted at a duly called meeting of the board, and no individual of the board shall exercise any individual administrative authority with respect to the department.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1557, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1798, § 3, effective July 1.

25.5-1-303. Powers and duties of the board - scope of authority - rules.

The board shall have the authority set forth in subsection (3) of this section over the following programs administered by the state department:

The "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", as specified in articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title;

The "Colorado indigent care program", as specified in part 1 of article 3 of this title;

Repealed.

The "Children's Basic Health Plan Act", as specified in article 8 of this title;

The old age pension health and medical care program, as specified in section 25.5-2-101;

Programs, services, and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as specified in article 10 of this title.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any specific statutory provision granting rule-making authority to the board in relation to a specific program.

The board shall adopt rules in connection with the programs set forth in subsection (1) of this section governing the following:

The implementation of legislative and departmental policies and procedures for such programs; except that no rules shall be promulgated for any policy or procedure which governs the administration of the state department as specified in section 25.5-1-108 (1);

The establishment of eligibility requirements for persons receiving services from the state department;

The establishment of the type of benefits that a recipient of services may obtain if eligibility requirements are met, subject to the authorization, requirements, and availability of such benefits;

The requirements, obligations, and rights of clients and recipients;

The establishment of a procedure to resolve disputes that may arise between clients and the state department or clients and providers;

The requirements, obligations, and rights of providers, including policies and procedures related to provider payments that may affect client benefits;

The establishment of a procedure to resolve disputes that may arise between providers and between the state department and providers.

At the request of the executive director, the board shall advise the executive director as to any proposed policies or rules governing programs administered by the state department that are not set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

The board shall have no authority over the revenue of the state department.

All rules and orders of the department of human services in connection with the old age pension health and medical care program shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

The rules issued by the state board shall be binding upon the county departments. At any public hearing relating to a proposed rule-making, interested persons shall have the right to present their data, views, or arguments orally. Proposed rules of the state board shall be subject to the provisions of section 24-4-103, C.R.S.

To the extent that rules are promulgated by the state board of human services for programs or providers that receive either medicaid only or both medicaid and nonmedicaid funding, the rules shall be developed in cooperation with the state department and shall not conflict with state statutes or federal statutes or regulations.

The rules and orders of the department of human services and the state board of human services in connection with the programs, services, and supports specified in paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1558, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3)(e) to (3)(g) amended, p. 928, § 32, effective May 25.

L. 99:

(1)(c) amended and (1)(e) added, p. 701, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(f) and (7) added, pp. 916, 917, §§ 13, 14, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(7) amended, p. 2009, § 90, effective May 22; (4) amended and (8) added, p. 2584, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1798, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(c) repealed, p. 2042, § 71, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(e) and (6) amended, (SB 11-210), ch. 187, p. 722, § 8, effective July 15, 2012.

L. 2013:

(1)(f) and (9) added, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1808, § 43, effective March 1, 2014.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending subsection (1)(c) and enacting subsection (1)(e), see section 1 of chapter 203, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.

25.5-1-304. Repeal of part. (Deleted by amendment)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part added, p. 1559, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 410, § 9, effective April 13.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1800, § 3, effective July 1.